Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.340

Examination of records—Copies—Fees.

(1) The administrator, without prior notice, may examine the records and require copies of the records which a licensed commodity broker-dealer or commodity sales representative is required to make and maintain under RCW 21.30.320, within or without this state, in a manner reasonable under the circumstances. Commodity broker-dealers and commodity sales representatives must make their records available to the administrator in a readable form.

(2) The administrator may copy records or require a licensed person to copy records and provide the copies to the administrator in a manner reasonable under the circumstances.

(3) The administrator may impose reasonable fees for conducting an examination pursuant to this section.

[ 1986 c 14 s 35.]